Utah statutes.
4-39-103.   Department's responsibilities.

The department is responsible for enforcing laws and rules relating to:

(1)  the importation, possession, or transportation of domesticated elk into the state or within the state;

(2)  the inspection of domesticated elk facilities;

(3)  preventing the outbreak and controlling the spread of disease-causing pathogens among domesticated elk in domesticated elk facilities;

(4)  preventing the spread of disease-causing pathogens from domesticated elk to wildlife, other animals, or humans; and

(5)  if necessary, quarantining any domesticated elk pursuant to Title 4, Chapter 31, Livestock Inspection and Quarantine.

